Maryland, session 2025, SB0505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
4–402.
An annexation proposal may be initiated by:
(1) the legislative body of the municipality as provided in § 4–403 of this
subtitle; or
(2) a petition in accordance with § 4–404 of this subtitle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0505*

SENATE BILL 505
4–413.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PERSON” INCLUDES A REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
IN A CHARTER COUNTY THAT:
(1) IS CREATED BY STATUTE;
(2) OWNS PROPERTY THAT HAS RECEIVED CAPITAL FUNDS FROM THE
STATE FOR REDEVELOPMENT; AND
(3) HAS ENTERED INTO A CONTRACT, AFTER A COMPETITIVE
SOLICITATION, WITH A FOR–PROFIT ENTITY FOR THE REDEVELOPMENT OF THE
PROPERTY.
(B) If fewer than 20 residents in an area to be annexed are eligible to sign a
petition for annexation and vote in a referendum under this subtitle, any person, including
the two or more joint owners of jointly owned property, who owns real property in the area
to be annexed may sign the petition and vote in the referendum.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.